Utah statutes.
70A-7a-104.   Negotiable and nonnegotiable document of title.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (3), a document of title is
negotiable if by its terms the goods are to be delivered to bearer or to the
order of a named person.
(2)  A document of title other than one described in Subsection (1) is
nonnegotiable.  A bill of lading that states that the goods are consigned to a
named person is not made negotiable by a provision that the goods are to be
delivered only against an order in a record signed by the same or another
named person.
(3)  A document of title is nonnegotiable if, at the time it is issued, the
document has a conspicuous legend, however expressed, that it is
nonnegotiable.
